New Mexico, session 2026, SB179.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Three hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($350,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the
board of regents of the university of New Mexico for
expenditure in fiscal years 2027 and 2028 for the health
sciences center office for diversity, equity and inclusion for
Spanish-language health sciences curriculum development and
implementation to enhance the medical Spanish education program
for health sciences center students. Any unexpended balance
remaining at the end of fiscal year 2028 shall revert to the
general fund.
.233172.1